Utah statutes.
72-12-105.   Worker compensation inapplicable to injuries in ride-sharing.

Section 34A-2-401 providing compensation for workers injured during the course of their employment does not apply to persons injured while participating in a ride-sharing arrangement between their places of residence and places of employment.

